Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1137.
do enact as follows:SB1137,11Section 1. 14.57 of the statutes is created to read:SB1137,2,2214.57 Same; attached boards.SB1137,3,23(1) WisEARNS board. There is created a WisEARNS board that is attached 4to the state treasurer under s. 15.03. Of the members appointed under pars. (a) to 5(e), at least one must have experience in the field of investments, at least one must 6have experience as the owner of a business that employs between 5 and 50 people, 7and at least one must be an employee who is not eligible for or does not have access 1to an employer-sponsored retirement plan. The board shall consist of the following 2members appointed for 4-year terms:SB1137,3,33(a) The state treasurer or his or her designee.SB1137,3,44(b) The secretary of financial institutions or his or her designee.SB1137,3,75(c) One member who has a favorable reputation for skill, knowledge, and 6experience in the field of retirement saving and investments, appointed by the 7governor.SB1137,3,98(d) One member who has a favorable reputation for skill, knowledge, and 9experience relating to small business, appointed by the governor.SB1137,3,1310(e) One member who is a representative of an association representing 11employees or who has a favorable reputation for skill, knowledge, and experience in 12the interests of employees in retirement saving, appointed by the speaker of the 13assembly.SB1137,3,1614(f) One member who has a favorable reputation for skill, knowledge, and 15experience in the interests of employers in retirement saving, appointed by the 16president of the senate.SB1137,3,1917(g) One member who has a favorable reputation for skill, knowledge, and 18experience in retirement investment products or retirement plan designs, 19appointed by the state treasurer.SB1137,3,2020(h) One member appointed by the investment board.SB1137,3,2221(i) One member appointed, notwithstanding s. 15.07 (4), by a majority vote of 22all of the members identified in pars. (a) to (h).SB1137,4,323(2) Membership prohibited. No individual appointed under sub. (1) (a) to 1(h) may be a dealer or broker in securities, or be employed by an entity that is 2primarily a dealer or broker in securities, and any member who accepts such 3employment shall vacate his or her membership.SB1137,24Section 2. 14.69 of the statutes is created to read:SB1137,4,5514.69 WisEARNS program. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB1137,4,66(a) “Board” means the WisEARNS board.SB1137,4,97(b) “Earnings” means all remuneration for employment or services provided to 8an individual in this state, including salary, fees, bonuses, and including the cash 9value of all remuneration paid in any medium other than cash.SB1137,4,1310(c) “Eligible employee” means an employee who is 18 years of age or older who 11works in this state and whose private employer does not offer a retirement savings 12plan or who is not eligible to participate in a qualified retirement savings plan 13offered by his or her private employer.SB1137,4,1414(d) “Investment administrator” means the vendor selected under sub. (3) (e).SB1137,4,1515(e) “Plan” means the WisEARNS plan established under sub. (3).SB1137,4,2016(f) “Private employer” means any person engaging in any activity, enterprise 17or business in this state that has conducted such activity, enterprise, or business in 18this state for at least 2 years after the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB 19inserts date], and did not offer a retirement plan qualified under the Internal 20Revenue Code during those 2 years.SB1137,4,2221(g) “WisEARNS retirement account” means a retirement savings account 22established under the plan.SB1137,5,21(h) “WisEARNS savings account” means a savings account established under 2the plan that is not a retirement savings account.SB1137,5,63(2) Duties of treasurer, executive director, and board. (a) The 4treasurer shall recommend an executive director of the plan to the board, which 5shall appoint an executive director outside the classified service, to serve at the 6pleasure of the board. The executive director may not be a member of the board.SB1137,5,87(b) The executive director appointed under par. (a) shall appoint staff for the 8plan outside the classified service.SB1137,5,139(3) Establishment of plan. The board shall establish, implement, and 10oversee a plan that meets the requirements specified in sub. (8) that shall enroll 11eligible employees beginning not more than 2 years after the effective date of this 12subsection .... [LRB inserts date]. Before establishing and implementing the plan, 13the board shall do all of the following:SB1137,5,1614(a) Conduct a legal analysis regarding the applicability of the federal 15Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, 29 USC 1001 to 1461, and the 16Internal Revenue Code to the proposed plan.SB1137,5,2017(b) Enter into interagency agreements with the department of revenue, the 18department of financial institutions, and the department of workforce development 19to assist the board in providing outreach services to private employers and 20employees.SB1137,6,221(c) Prepare and issue a request for information from prospective vendors of 22retirement savings accounts described in 26 USC 408 (a), individual retirement 23annuities described in 26 USC 408 (b), individual retirement bonds, and individual 1savings accounts to determine the feasibility of the proposed plan and the existence 2of plans in the private market that meet the requirements set forth in sub. (8).SB1137,6,53(d) Investigate means of allowing individuals who are not automatically 4enrolled in the plan to enroll in the plan and make contributions to retirement 5savings accounts.SB1137,6,126(e) Based on the results of the request for information under par. (c), prepare 7and issue a request for proposals from prospective vendors and select a vendor. The 8board shall determine the factors to be considered in selecting a vendor for the plan, 9which shall include the ability of the vendor to meet all of the requirements of the 10plan set forth in sub. (8) (a) to (z). Sections 16.705 and 16.75 do not apply to a 11contract entered into under this section. Before awarding a contract under this 12section, the board shall do all of the following:SB1137,6,14131. Conduct a cost-benefit analysis to identify and compare the total cost, 14quality, and technical expertise of the vendors that submitted proposals.SB1137,6,21152. Review the independence and relationship, if any, of the vendors that 16submitted proposals to employees of the board and the disclosure of any former 17employment of the vendor or employees of the vendor with the board, to minimize 18the likelihood of selection of a vendor that provides or is likely to provide services to 19industries, client groups, or individuals who are the object of state regulation or the 20recipients of state funding to a degree that the vendor’s independence would be 21compromised.SB1137,7,5223. If the vendor or employees of the vendor have access to federal tax 23information received directly from the federal internal revenue service or from a 1source that is authorized by the federal internal revenue service, for the 2performance of services under the contract under this section, require proof of a 3background investigation on each individual performing the services. Such a 4background check shall meet the standards established by the federal internal 5revenue service under 26 USC 6103 (p) (4) (C).SB1137,7,76(f) Ensure compliance by the plan with all applicable provisions of the 7Internal Revenue Code and U.S. department of treasury regulations.SB1137,7,128(5) Ineligible vendor list. The board shall maintain a list of persons that 9are or have been a party to a contract under this section that have violated a 10provision of this section or a contract under this section. The board shall annually 11forward this list to the department of administration for inclusion in the ineligible 12vendor list under s. 16.705 (9). Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb1137 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb1137 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1137 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1137 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB1137: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting